Washington statutes.
RCW 4.08.160

Action to determine conflicting claims to property.

Anyone having in his or her possession, or under his or her control, any property or money, or being indebted, where more than one person claims to be the owner of, entitled to, interested in, or to have a lien on, such property, money, or indebtedness, or any part thereof, may commence an action in the superior court against all or any of such persons, and have their rights, claims, interest, or liens adjudged, determined, and adjusted in such action.

[ 2011 c 336 s 76; 1890 p 93 s 1; RRS s 199.]